Washington statutes.
RCW 13.34.176

Violation of alcohol or substance abuse treatment conditions—Hearing—Notice—Modification of order.

(1) The court, upon receiving a report under RCW 13.34.174(4) or at the department's request, may schedule a show cause hearing to determine whether the person is in violation of the treatment conditions. All parties shall be given notice of the hearing. The court shall hold the hearing within ten days of the request for a hearing. At the hearing, testimony, declarations, reports, or other relevant information may be presented on the person's alleged failure to comply with the treatment plan and the person shall have the right to present similar information on his or her own behalf.

(2) If the court finds that there has been a violation of the treatment conditions it shall modify the dependency order, as necessary, to ensure the safety of the child. The modified order shall remain in effect until the party is in full compliance with the treatment requirements.

[ 2018 c 284 s 18; 2009 c 520 s 33; 2000 c 122 s 24; 1993 c 412 s 6.]